New Jersey, session 222, S2333.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Electric vehicle means a vehicle that has a battery or equivalent energy storage device that can be charged from an electricity supply external to the vehicle. Highway means a highway which is designated part of the Interstate System as provided in Title 23 of the United States Code, or is a limited access highway as defined in section 1 of P.L.1945, c.83 (C.27:7A-1). b.  The Commissioner of Transportation shall erect and maintain highway exit signs to assist motorists in the identification of, availability of, and  direction of electric vehicle charging stations. c.  The dimensions and location of each highway exit sign shall comply with all applicable federal and State laws and shall meet all design and placement guidelines for such signs as established pursuant to the provisions of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways issued by the Federal Highway Administration in the United States Department of Transportation. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.